Hawaii statutes.
§663-8 Damages, future earnings.
Together with other damages which may be recovered by law, the legal
representative of the deceased person may recover where applicable under
section 663-7 the future earnings of the decedent in excess of the probable cost
of the decedent's own maintenance and the provision decedent would have made
for his or her actual or probable family and dependents during the period of
time decedent would have likely lived but for the accident. [L 1973, c 213, §3]

Case Notes

Recovery by decedent's estate, discussed. 823 F. Supp. 778
(1993).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next